Massachusetts, session 194th, H3460.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.Subsection (b)(2) of section 21 of chapter 25 of the General Laws as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting after the word “benefits.”
in line 115 the following words:-
The plan must include programs for in-depth education and training to be offered
statewide to commercial building managers and operators, whether such buildings are privately
owned or owned by a non-profit organization, and the programs shall educate and train such
managers about how to economically achieve greater energy efficiency and reduced energy use,
whether such use is electricity, natural gas or heating oil, and may include, but not be limited to,
best energy use and efficiency practices, use of new technologies, use of metering, tracking, and
of 2

monitoring energy use, and economic analysis of reduced energy use. Such education and
training sessions may be offered both in person and on-line and shall include interactive teaching
methods, case studies, and subject matter experts. This required education and training
component of the plan shall consider using existing training programs offered by the Association
of Energy Engineers, the Building Operators Certificate Program, the Building Owners and
Managers Institute, or other similar programs, and shall be approved by a five member advisory
committee made up of two building operators or building managers named by the Greater
Boston Real Estate Board, two members who are energy efficiency experts named jointly by the
electric and natural gas distribution companies and the Energy Efficiency Advisory Council, and
one member named jointly by the Greater Boston Real Estate Board and the Energy Efficiency
Advisory Council who shall be the chair. The companies shall every six months report to the
committee on the utilization of the education and training programs and attendee feedback on the
value of the programs. The cost of such training shall be split between the attendees and the
distribution companies, with the distribution companies using monies from energy efficiency
funding, and attendees at the education and training sessions who shall pay no more than 30
percent of the costs. The plan shall include tuition reimbursement for education and training
programs for building operators and engineers that are approved by the committee, including but
not limited to energy efficiency programs offered by the Association of Energy Engineers, the
Building Operators Certificate Program, and the Building Owners and Managers Institute.
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall take effect immediately and the education and training
sessions required in the plans that are required by section 1 shall begin to be offered no later than
September 1, 2026.
of 2